Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-941
Limitation of actions; burden of proof.

(1) A civil action under the False Medicaid Claims Act shall be brought within six years after the date the claim is discovered or should have been discovered by exercise of reasonable diligence and, in any event, no more than ten years after the date on which the violation of the act was committed.

(2) In an action brought under the act, the state shall prove all essential elements of the cause of action, including damages, by a preponderance of the evidence.

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 71;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1037.05;

Laws 2004, LB 1084, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,2004, § 68-1080;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 41.